Massachusetts, session 194th, H1271.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4C the
following section:-
Section 4C½. No insurer licensed to write and engaged in the writing of homeowners
insurance in this commonwealth nor the joint underwriting association, set forth in chapter 175C,
shall include in its homeowner insurance policies a provision requiring an insured to complete a
repair prior to the release of funds estimated by the insurer for the cost of repair.
of 1